Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2650.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5988YH (2) 91 as/js H.F. 2650 Section 1. Section 124.414, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. âDrug paraphernaliaâ does not include hypodermic any of 3 the following: 4 (1) Hypodermic needles or syringes if manufactured, 5 delivered, sold, or possessed for a lawful purpose. 6 (2) Equipment, products, or materials used to analyze or 7 test for the presence of fentanyl, a fentanyl analog, or a drug 8 adulterant within a controlled substance. 9